District of Columbia statutes.
16-3548

Recovery of damages from usurper; limitation.

At any time within a year from a judgment in a quo warranto proceeding, the relator may bring an action against the party ousted and recover the damages sustained by the relator by reason of the ousted party’s usurpation of the office to which the relator was entitled.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 603, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(n)
1981 Ed., § 16-3548.
1973 Ed., § 16-3548.